Utah statutes.
17-22-28.   Maintaining order -- Imposing restitution.
(1)  If a prisoner commits an act of violence against another person, attempts
to damage jail property, attempts to escape, or refuses to obey a lawful order
and reasonable command, an officer or other employee of the jail may use all
reasonable means under the circumstances, including the use of a weapon, to
defend himself, defend another, protect jail property, prevent escape, or
enforce compliance with a lawful order and reasonable command.
(2)  A jail may request restitution from a prisoner for damaging jail property
as part of an administrative disciplinary hearing.  To enforce restitution, a
jail may withdraw money from or place a hold on a prisoner’s account.
